Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-201.03
Judges; salary increase; when effective.

Sections 24-201.01, 24-301.01, and 24-1101 shall be so interpreted as to effectuate their general purpose to provide, in the public interest, adequate compensation for the judges of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, district court, and separate juvenile courts and to permit a change in such salaries as soon as the same may become operative under the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1967, c. 136, § 3, p. 422;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 30.